California, session 20252026, SB1368.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2530.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2530.2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:(a) “Board” means the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.(b) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, or other organization or combination thereof, except that only individuals can be licensed or registered under this chapter.(c) A “speech-language pathologist” is a person who practices speech-language pathology.(d) The practice of speech-language pathology means all of the following:(1) The application of principles, methods, instrumental procedures, and noninstrumental procedures for measurement, testing, screening, evaluation, identification, prediction, and counseling related to the development and disorders of speech, voice, language, or swallowing.(2) The application of principles and methods for preventing, planning, directing, conducting, and supervising programs for habilitating, rehabilitating, ameliorating, managing, or modifying disorders of speech, voice, language, or swallowing in individuals or groups of individuals.(3) Conducting hearing screenings.(4) Performing suctioning in connection with the scope of practice described in paragraphs (1) and (2), after compliance with a medical facility’s training protocols on suctioning procedures.(e) (1) Instrumental procedures referred to in subdivision (d) are the use of rigid and flexible endoscopes to observe the pharyngeal and laryngeal areas of the throat in order to observe, collect data, and measure the parameters of communication and swallowing as well as to guide communication and swallowing assessment and therapy. Passage of these instruments without the presence of a physician and surgeon is subject to paragraph (2).(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as a diagnosis. Any observation of an abnormality shall be referred to a physician and surgeon.(f) (1) A licensed speech-language pathologist shall not perform a flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedure unless they have received written verification from one otolaryngologist certified by the American Board of Otolaryngology – Head and Neck Surgery that the speech-language pathologist has performed a minimum of 25 supervised flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures and they are competent to perform these procedures. Of these 25 procedures, the first 10 procedures shall be supervised by a licensed physician and surgeon who performs nasal endoscopy as part of their practice and the subsequent 15 procedures shall be supervised by either a licensed physician and surgeon who performs nasal endoscopy as part of their practice or by another licensed speech-language pathologist who is verified as competent in performing flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures. The speech-language pathologist shall have this written verification on file and readily available for inspection upon request by the board. A speech-language pathologist with a verification on file shall pass a flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic instrument only upon the orders of a licensed physician and surgeon. The order by a physician and surgeon is deemed to allow a speech-language pathologist with verification, in accordance with this paragraph, to perform fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures at a location based on the patient’s medical needs that complies with procedures specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).(2) A licensed speech-language pathologist who holds a written verification pursuant to this subdivision that was issued before January 1, 2023, shall be deemed to meet the requirements described in paragraph (1).(g) (1) A licensed speech-language pathologist shall only perform flexible endoscopic procedures described in subdivision (f) in the following settings that requires the facility to have protocols for emergency medical backup procedures, including a physician and surgeon or other appropriate medical professionals being readily available.(A) A clinic, as defined in Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A facility described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(C) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(D) A hospice facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1745) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(E) A medical group practice, including a professional medical corporation, as defined in Section 2406, another form of corporation controlled by physicians and surgeons, a medical partnership, a medical foundation exempt from licensure, or another lawfully organized group of physicians and surgeons that provides health care services.(2) A licensed speech-language pathologist performing flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures on patients who have contraindications to the procedure shall consult and document clearance with the physician and surgeon that the licensed speech-language pathologist can safely perform the procedure. For purposes of this paragraph, contraindications for these procedures may include, but are not limited to, cases of bilateral obstruction of nasal passages, refractory epistaxis, cardiac disorder with acute risk of vasovagal episode and bradycardia, history of vasovagal episodes, facial trauma, recent trauma to the nasal cavity, or surrounding tissue and structures secondary to surgery or injury, severe bleeding disorders, severe movement disorders, severe agitation, and inability to cooperate with the examination.(h) “Speech-language pathology aide” means any person meeting the minimum requirements established by the board, who works directly under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist.(i) (1) “Speech-language pathology assistant” means a person who meets the academic and supervised training requirements set forth by the board and who is approved by the board to assist in the provision of speech-language pathology under the direction and supervision of a speech-language pathologist who shall be responsible for the extent, kind, and quality of the services provided by the speech-language pathology assistant.(2) The supervising speech-language pathologist employed or contracted for by a public school may hold a valid and current license issued by the board, a valid, current, and professional clear clinical or rehabilitative services credential in language, speech, and hearing issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, or other credential authorizing service in language, speech, and hearing issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that is not issued on the basis of an emergency permit or waiver of requirements. For purposes of this paragraph, a “clear” credential is a credential that is not issued pursuant to a waiver or emergency permit and is as otherwise defined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. Nothing in this section referring to credentialed supervising speech-language pathologists expands existing exemptions from licensing pursuant to Section 2530.5.(j) An “audiologist” is one who practices audiology.(k) “The practice of audiology” means the application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, counseling, and instruction related to auditory, vestibular, and related functions and the modification of communicative disorders involving speech, language, auditory behavior, or other aberrant behavior resulting from auditory dysfunction; and the planning, directing, conducting, supervising, or participating in programs of identification of auditory disorders, hearing conservation, cerumen removal, aural habilitation, and rehabilitation, including hearing aid recommendation and evaluation procedures, including, but not limited to, specifying amplification requirements and evaluation of the results thereof, auditory training, and speech reading, and the fitting of hearing aids.(l) A “dispensing audiologist” is an audiologist who is authorized to sell hearing aids.(m) “Audiology aide” means any person meeting the minimum requirements established by the board who works directly under the supervision of an audiologist. The board may by regulation exempt certain functions performed by an industrial audiology aide from supervision provided that their employer has established a set of procedures or protocols that the aide shall follow in performing these functions.(n) “Medical board” means the Medical Board of California.(o) A “hearing screening” performed by a speech-language pathologist means a binary puretone screening at a preset intensity level for the purpose of determining if the screened individuals are in need of further medical or audiological evaluation.(p) “Cerumen removal” means the nonroutine removal of cerumen within the cartilaginous ear canal necessary for access in performance of audiological procedures that shall occur under physician and surgeon supervision. Cerumen removal, as provided by this section, shall only be performed by a licensed audiologist. Physician and surgeon supervision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician, but shall include all of the following:(1) Collaboration on the development of written standardized protocols. The protocols shall include a requirement that the supervised audiologist immediately refer to an appropriate physician any trauma, including skin tears, bleeding, or other pathology of the ear discovered in the process of cerumen removal as defined in this subdivision.(2) Approval by the supervising physician of the written standardized protocol.(3) The supervising physician shall be within the general vicinity, as provided by the physician-audiologist protocol, of the supervised audiologist and available by telephone contact at the time of cerumen removal.(4) A licensed physician and surgeon may not simultaneously supervise more than two audiologists for purposes of cerumen removal.SEC. 2. Section 2530.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2530.3. (a) A person represents themselves to be a speech-language pathologist when they hold themselves out to the public by any title, business name, or description of services incorporating the words “speech pathologist,” “speech pathology,” “speech therapy,” “speech correction,” “speech correctionist,” “speech therapist,” “speech clinic,” “speech clinician,” “language pathologist,” “language pathology,” “logopedics,” “logopedist,” “communicology,” “communicologist,” “aphasiologist,” “voice therapy,” “voice therapist,” “voice pathology,” or “voice pathologist,” “language therapist,” or “phoniatrist,” or any similar titles; or when they purport to treat stuttering, stammering, or other disorders of speech.(b) A person represents themselves to be an audiologist when they hold themselves out to the public by any title, business name, or description of services incorporating the terms “audiology,” “audiologist,” “audiological,” “hearing clinic,” “hearing clinician,” “hearing therapist,” or any similar titles.SEC. 3. Section 2530.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2530.5. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting hearing testing conducted by licensed physicians and surgeons or by persons conducting hearing tests under the direct supervision of a physician and surgeon.(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a licensed hearing aid dispenser from engaging in testing of hearing and other practices and procedures used solely for the fitting and selling of hearing aids nor does this chapter restrict persons practicing their licensed profession and operating within the scope of their licensed profession or employed by someone operating within the scope of their licensed professions, including persons fitting and selling hearing aids who are properly licensed or registered under the laws of the State of California.(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting or preventing the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology by personnel holding the appropriate credential from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as long as the practice is conducted within the confines of or under the jurisdiction of a public preschool, elementary, or secondary school by which they are employed and those persons do not either offer to render or render speech-language pathology or audiology services to the public for compensation over and above the salary they receive from the public preschool, elementary, or secondary school by which they are employed for the performance of their official duties.(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the activities and services of a student or speech-language pathology intern in speech-language pathology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech-language pathology at an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility, provided that these activities and services constitute a part of their supervised course of study and that those persons are designated by the title as “speech-language pathology intern,” “speech-language pathology trainee,” or other title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training.(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the activities and services of a student or audiology intern in audiology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in audiology at an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility, provided that these activities and services constitute a part of their supervised course of study and that those persons are designated by the title as “audiology intern,” “audiology trainee,” or other title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training.(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the practice of an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25 and who has been issued a temporary license pursuant to Section 2532.7. The number of applicants who may be supervised by a licensed speech-language pathologist or a speech-language pathologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board shall be determined by the board. The supervising speech-language pathologist shall register with the board the name of each applicant working under their supervision. The number of applicants who may be supervised by a licensed audiologist or an audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board shall be determined by the board. The supervising audiologist shall register with the board the name of each applicant working under their supervision.(g) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting hearing screening services in public or private elementary or secondary schools so long as these screening services are provided by persons registered as qualified school audiometrists pursuant to Sections 1685 and 1686 of the Health and Safety Code or hearing screening services supported by the State Department of Health Care Services so long as these screening services are provided by appropriately trained or qualified personnel.(h) Persons employed as speech-language pathologists or audiologists by a federal agency shall be exempt from this chapter.(i) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting consultation or the instructional or supervisory activities of a faculty member of an approved or accredited college or university for the first 60 days following appointment after the effective date of this subdivision.SEC. 4. Section 2530.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2530.6. (a) Speech-language pathologists and audiologists supervising speech-language pathology or audiology aides shall register with the board the name of each aide working under their supervision.(b) The number of aides who may be supervised by a licensee shall be determined by the board.(c) The supervising audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall be responsible for the extent, kind, and quality of services performed by the aide, consistent with the board’s designated standards and requirements.(d) A speech-language pathology and audiology aide registration shall expire every two years and is subject to the renewal requirements in Article 6 (commencing with Section 2535).(e) At the time of registration renewal, the speech-language pathologist or audiologist supervising the speech-language pathology or audiology aide shall update the board on the duties the aide performs while assisting the supervisor in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology, and the training program and assessment methods the supervisor is utilizing to ensure the aide’s continued competency.(f) An aide shall not advertise or otherwise represent that they hold a license as a speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathology assistant, or audiologist. SEC. 5. Section 2530.8 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2530.8. Every person holding a license or registration under this chapter shall display it conspicuously in their primary place of practice or business.SEC. 6. Section 2530.9 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2530.9. (a) An aide or a required professional experience license holder shall not be the sole proprietor of, manage, or independently operate a business that engages in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology. (b) A speech-language pathology assistant shall not be the sole proprietor of, manage, or independently operate a business that engages in the practice of speech-language pathology.SEC. 7. Section 2531 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2531. (a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board in which the enforcement, administration, and other regulatory duties of this chapter are vested. The Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board shall consist of nine members, three of whom shall be public members.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.SEC. 8. Section 2531.3 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 9. Section 2531.4 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 10. Section 2531.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2531.5. The board shall issue, suspend, and revoke licenses or registrations and approvals to practice speech-language pathology, audiology, and hearing aid dispensing as authorized by this chapter.SEC. 11. Section 2531.75 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2531.75. (a) The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer. The executive officer shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in them by this chapter.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 12. Section 2532 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532. No person shall engage in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology or represent themselves as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist unless they are licensed in accordance with this article.SEC. 13. Section 2532.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.2. Except as required by Section 2532.25, to be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, the applicant shall possess all of the following qualifications:(a) Possess at least a master’s degree in speech-language pathology, communication disorders, communication sciences and disorders, communicative disorders, speech, language, and hearing sciences, or audiology from an educational institution approved by the board or qualifications deemed equivalent by the board.(b) (1) Submit evidence of the satisfactory completion of supervised clinical practice with individuals representative of a wide spectrum of ages and communication disorders. The board shall establish by regulation the required number of clock hours, not to exceed 375 clock hours, of supervised clinical practice necessary for the applicant.(2) The clinical practice shall be under the direction of an educational institution approved by the board.(c) (1) Submit evidence of no less than 36 weeks of satisfactorily completed supervised professional full-time experience or 72 weeks of professional part-time experience obtained under the supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist or a speech-language pathologist or audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board. This experience shall be evaluated and approved by the board. The required professional experience shall follow completion of the requirements listed in subdivisions (a) and (b). Full time is defined as at least 36 weeks in a calendar year and a minimum of 30 hours per week. Part time is defined as a minimum of 72 weeks and a minimum of 15 hours per week.(2) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist who holds a license from another state or territory of the United States or who holds equivalent qualifications as determined by the board and who has completed no less than one year of full-time continuous employment as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist within the past three years is exempt from the supervised professional experience in paragraph (1).(d) Pass an examination or examinations approved by the board.(e) As applied to licensure as an audiologist, this section shall apply to applicants who graduated from an approved educational institution on or before December 31, 2007.SEC. 14. Section 2532.25 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.25. (a) An applicant seeking licensure as an audiologist shall possess a doctorate in audiology earned from an educational institution approved by the board. The board may, in its discretion, accept qualifications it deems to be equivalent to a doctoral degree in audiology. The board shall not, however, accept as equivalent qualifications graduation from a master’s program that the applicant was enrolled in on or after January 1, 2008.(b) In addition to meeting the qualifications specified in subdivision (a), an applicant seeking licensure as an audiologist shall do all of the following:(1) Submit evidence of the satisfactory completion of supervised clinical practice with individuals representative of a wide spectrum of ages and audiological disorders. The board shall establish by regulation the required number of clock hours of supervised clinical practice necessary for the applicant. The clinical practice shall be under the direction of an audiology doctoral program at an educational institution approved by the board.(2) Submit evidence of no less than 12 months of satisfactorily completed supervised professional full-time experience or its part-time equivalent obtained under the supervision of a licensed audiologist or an audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board. This experience shall be completed under the direction of an audiology doctoral program at an educational institution approved by the board.(3) Pass an examination or examinations approved by the board.(c) This section shall apply to applicants who graduate from an approved educational institution on and after January 1, 2008.SEC. 15. Section 2532.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.4. (a) The board shall direct applicants to be examined for knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in speech-language pathology or audiology it deems appropriate. It shall examine the applicant with regard to their professional skills and their judgment in the utilization of speech-language pathology or audiology techniques and methods.(b) The board shall determine what constitutes a passing grade. An applicant who fails an examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination.(c) The board, at its discretion, may waive the examination or examinations when in the judgment of the board the applicant has already demonstrated competence in areas covered by the examination or examinations.(d) The examination or examinations required by the board for a license under this article may be conducted by the board or by a public or private organization specified by the board. The examination or examinations may be conducted under a uniform examination system, and for that purpose, the board may make arrangements with organizations furnishing examination or examinations materials as may, in its discretion, be desirable. All aspects of the examination or examinations shall be in compliance with Section 139.SEC. 16. Section 2532.5 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 17. Section 2532.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.6. (a) The Legislature recognizes that the education and experience requirements of this chapter constitute only minimal requirements to assure the public of professional competence. The Legislature encourages all professionals licensed and registered by the board under this chapter to regularly engage in continuing professional development and learning that is related and relevant to the professions of speech-language pathology and audiology.(b) The board shall not renew any license or registration pursuant to this article unless the applicant certifies to the board that they have completed in the preceding two years not less than the minimum number of continuing professional development hours established by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) for the professional practice authorized by their license or registration.(c) (1) The board shall prescribe the forms utilized and the number of hours of required continuing professional development for persons licensed under this article.(2) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing professional development requirements.(3) Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing professional development coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.(d) The board shall establish exceptions from the continuing professional development requirements of this section for good cause as defined by the board.(e) (1) The continuing professional development services shall be obtained from any of the following:(A) Accredited institutions of higher learning.(B) Organizations approved as continuing education providers by either the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, the California Medical Association’s Continuing Medical Education Program, the California Academy of Audiology, the California Speech-Language-Hearing Association, or the American Medical Association.(C) A federal, state, or local governmental entity.(D) Other entities or organizations approved as continuing professional development providers by the board, in its discretion.(2) No hours shall be credited for any course enrolled in by a licensee that has not first been approved and certified by the board, if the board has sufficient funding and staff resources to implement the approval and certification process.(3) The continuing professional development services offered by these entities may, but are not required to, utilize pretesting and posttesting or other evaluation techniques to measure and demonstrate improved professional learning and competency.(4) An accredited institution of higher learning, an organization approved as continuing education providers by either the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, the California Medical Association’s Continuing Education Program, the California Academy of Audiology, the California Speech-Language-Hearing Association, or the American Medical Association, or a federal, state, or local governmental entity shall be exempt from any application or registration fees that the board may charge for continuing education providers.(5) Unless a course offered by entities listed in paragraph (4) meets the requirements established by the board, the course may not be credited towards the continuing professional development requirements for license renewal.(6) The licensee shall be responsible for obtaining the required course completion documents for courses offered by entities specified in paragraph (1).(f) The board, by regulation, shall fund the administration of this section through professional development services provider and licensing fees to be deposited in the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund. The fees related to the administration of this section shall be sufficient to meet, but shall not exceed, the costs of administering the corresponding provisions of this section.(g) The continuing professional development requirements adopted by the board shall comply with any guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs.SEC. 18. Section 2532.8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.8. (a) The board shall, until January 1, 2031, deem a person who holds a valid Certificate of Clinical Competence in Speech-Language Pathology issued by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council for Clinical Certification to have met the educational and experience requirements set forth for speech-language pathologists in Section 2532.2.(b) The board shall, until January 1, 2031, deem a person who holds either a valid Certificate of Clinical Competence in Audiology issued by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council for Clinical Certification or a valid American Board of Audiology certificate issued by the American Academy of Audiology to have met the educational and experience requirements set forth for audiologists in Section 2532.2 and 2532.25.(c) If an applicant qualifying for licensure under this section has obtained any equivalent qualifications in violation of the laws and regulations governing the practices of speech-language pathology or audiology or has not met the requirements for licensure, the applicant shall correct the deficiency to qualify for licensure. If the deficiency is not cured within one year from the date of the deficiency notice, the application for licensure is deemed abandoned.SEC. 19. Section 2532.9 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2532.9. (a) The board shall issue, upon an application prescribed by the board and payment of a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75), a retired license to a licensed speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathology assistant, audiologist, hearing aid dispenser, or dispensing audiologist who holds a license that is current and active or a license that is inactive, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or surrendered, is subject to disciplinary action under this chapter, has an accusation filed against their license by the Attorney General’s office and the charges are pending, or is confirmed by an internal investigation report signed by the executive officer to be under investigation by the board.(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active license is required or represent that they have an active license.(c) A retired license shall not be subject to renewal.(d) The holder of a retired license may apply once to restore their license to active status if the holder of a retired license meets all of the following requirements:(1) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial, revocation, or discipline of a license.(2) Pays the renewal fee required.(3) Completes the required continuing education as specified in subdivision (e).(4) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established by the board in regulation.(5) Either of the following apply:(A) The retired license was issued less than three years from the date of issuance.(B) The retired license was issued more than three years from the date of issuance, but the holder has continuously maintained a current, valid, active, and clear license in the same profession in another state or territory within the United States.(e) A holder of a retired license requesting to restore their license to active status pursuant to subdivision (d) shall complete continuing education equivalent to that required for a single license renewal period. Continuing education shall be completed in accordance with Section 2532.6 or 2538.18 except that all hours may be completed through self-study, as defined by the board in regulation.(f) The board shall issue a retired license for a second time pursuant to subdivision (a). A license shall remain on retired status after it has been placed on retired status for the second time.(g) The holder of a retired license shall apply for and obtain a new license if they have been on retired status for more than three years from the date of issuance, unless the holder continuously maintains a current, valid, active, and clear license in the same profession in another state or United States territory within the United States.(h) The holder of a retired license shall be permitted to use the title “retired.” The designation of retired shall not be abbreviated in any way.SEC. 20. Section 2533 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2533. The board may refuse to issue, or issue subject to terms and conditions, a license or registration on the grounds specified in Section 480, or may suspend, revoke, or impose terms and conditions upon the license or registration of any licensee or registrant for any of the following:(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a speech-language pathologist or audiologist or hearing aid dispenser, as the case may be. The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.(b) Securing a license or registration by fraud or deceit.(c) (1) The use or administering to themselves of any controlled substance.(2) The use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent or in a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to the licensee or registrant, to any other person, or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the licensee or registrant to practice speech-language pathology or audiology or hearing aid dispensing safely.(3) More than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section.(4) Any combination of paragraph (1), (2), or (3).The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of unprofessional conduct.(d) Engaging in any act in violation of Section 650.(e) Advertising in violation of Section 17500. Advertising an academic degree that was not validly awarded or earned under the laws of this state or the applicable jurisdiction in which it was issued is deemed to constitute a violation of Section 17500.(f) Committing a dishonest or fraudulent act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant.(g) Incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts.(h) Other acts that have endangered or are likely to endanger the health, welfare, and safety of the public.(i) Use by a hearing aid dispenser of the term “doctor” or “physician” or “clinic” or “audiologist,” or any derivation thereof, except as authorized by law.(j) The use, or causing the use, of any advertising or promotional literature in a manner that has the capacity or tendency to mislead or deceive purchasers or prospective purchasers.(k) Any cause that would be grounds for denial of an application for a license or registration.(l) Violation of Section 1689.6 or 1793.02 of the Civil Code.(m) Violation of a term or condition of a probationary order of a license or registration issued by the board pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(n) Violation of a term or condition of a conditional license or registration issued by the board pursuant to this section.(o) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory for any act substantially related to the practice of speech-language pathology, audiology, or hearing aid dispensing.(p) Aiding or abetting any person to engage in the unlicensed practice of speech-language pathology, audiology, or hearing aid dispensing.(q) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, any of the provisions of this chapter.SEC. 21. Section 2533.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2533.1. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a speech-language pathologist, audiologist, or hearing aid dispenser is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order a licensee or registrant to be disciplined or denied a license or registration as provided in Section 2533 when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, or 1203.41 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.SEC. 22. Section 2533.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2533.4. Whenever a person other than a person licensed or registered under this chapter has engaged in an act or practice which constitutes an offense under this chapter, a superior court of any county, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining the conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The board may commence action in the superior court under this section on its own motion.SEC. 23. Section 2533.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2533.6. (a) A person whose license or registration has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum period of time has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action or surrender of license:(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license or registration revoked for unprofessional conduct or surrendered, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.(2) At least two years for early termination or one year for modification of a condition of probation of three years or more.(3) At least one year for reinstatement of a license or registration revoked or surrendered for mental or physical illness, or for modification of a condition, or termination of probation of less than three years.(b) The petition shall be on a form provided by the board and shall state any facts and information as may be required by the board, including, but not limited to, proof of compliance with the terms and conditions of the underlying disciplinary order. The petition shall be verified by the petitioner who shall file an original and sufficient copies of the petition, together with any supporting documents, for the members of the board, the administrative law judge, and the Attorney General.(c) The petition may be heard by the board, with the matter presided over by an administrative law judge. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a decision as determined by the board which shall be acted upon in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.(d) The board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license or registration was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued, as the board or the administrative law judge finds necessary.(e) The administrative law judge when hearing a petition for reinstating a license or registration, or modifying a penalty, may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.(f) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner. The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.(g) The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition for termination or modification of probation filed pursuant to this section for any of the following:(1) The petitioner has failed to comply with the terms and conditions of the disciplinary order.(2) The board is conducting an investigation of the petitioner while they are on probation.(3) The petitioner has a subsequent arrest that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee or registrant and this arrest occurred while on probation.(4) The petitioner’s probation with the board is currently tolled.(h) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.SEC. 24. Section 2534.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2534.2. The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter is that established by the following schedule:(a) (1) The application fee and renewal fee for speech-language pathologists and nondispensing audiologists shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) but is sufficient to support the functions of the board that relate to the functions authorized by this chapter, excluding Article 9 (commencing with Section 2539.1).(2) The application fee and renewal fee for dispensing audiologists shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed two hundred eighty dollars ($280) but is sufficient to support the functions of the board that relate to the functions authorized by this chapter.(b) The delinquency fee shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).(c) The reexamination fee shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).(d) The registration fee and renewal fee of an aide shall be established by the board in an amount that does not exceed thirty dollars ($30).(e) A fee to be set by the board of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) shall be charged for each application for approval as a speech-language pathology assistant.(f) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) shall be charged for the issuance of and for the renewal of each approval as a speech-language pathology assistant, unless a lower fee is established by the board.(g) The duplicate wall certificate fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).(h) The duplicate renewal receipt fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).(i) The application fee and renewal fee for a temporary license is thirty dollars ($30).(j) The fee for issuance of a license or registration status and history certification letter shall be established by the board in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).SEC. 25. Section 2535 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2535. (a) All licenses or registrations issued under Sections 2530.6, 2532, and 2538 shall expire at 12 a.m. of the last date of the birth month of the licensee or registrant during the second year of a two-year term, if not renewed.(b) To renew an unexpired license or registration, the licensee or registrant shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license or registration, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.SEC. 26. Section 2535.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2535.2. Except as provided in Section 2535.3, a license or registration that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration upon filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license or registration is not renewed on or before its expiration, the licensee or registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license or registration shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 2535, after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.SEC. 27. Section 2535.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2535.4. A person who fails to renew their license or registration within the five years after its expiration may not renew it, and it may not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but that person may apply for and obtain a new license or registration if they meet all of the following requirements:(a) Have not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure or registration under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).(b) Take and pass the examination or examinations, if any, that would be required of them if an initial application for licensure or registration was being made, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, they are qualified to practice as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, as the case may be.(c) Pays all of the fees that would be required if an initial application for licensure or registration was being made. In addition, the board may charge the applicant a fee to cover the actual costs of any examination that it may administer.SEC. 28. Section 2538.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.1. (a) The board shall adopt regulations, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and the Advisory Commission on Special Education, that set forth standards and requirements for the adequate supervision of speech-language pathology assistants.(b) The board shall adopt regulations as reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, that shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:(1) Procedures and requirements for application, registration, renewal, suspension, and revocation.(2) Standards for approval of Speech-Language Pathology Assistant associate degree training programs based upon standards and curriculum guidelines established by the Council on Academic Accreditation in Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, or the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association, or equivalent formal training programs consisting of two years of technical education, including supervised field placements. The board may impanel site review committees to conduct onsite evaluations, inspections, and investigations of a speech-language pathology assistant training program and to assess the training program’s compliance with the board’s laws and regulations. The members of the site review committee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual travel and per diem expenses by the institution that is the subject of the evaluation, inspection, or investigation.(3) Standards for accreditation of a Speech-Language Pathology Assistant associate degree training program’s institution by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or the Senior College Commission of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or equivalent accreditation.(4) The scope of responsibility, duties, and functions of speech-language pathology assistants, that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Conducting speech-language screening, without interpretation, and using screening protocols developed by the supervising speech-language pathologist.(B) Providing direct treatment assistance to patients or clients under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist.(C) Following and implementing documented treatment plans or protocols developed by a supervising speech-language pathologist.(D) Documenting patient or client progress toward meeting established objectives, and reporting the information to a supervising speech-language pathologist.(E) Assisting a speech-language pathologist during assessments, including, but not limited to, assisting with formal documentation, preparing materials, and performing clerical duties for a supervising speech-language pathologist.(F) When competent to do so, as determined by the supervising speech-language pathologist, acting as an interpreter for non-English-speaking patients or clients and their family members.(G) Scheduling activities and preparing charts, records, graphs, and data.(H) Performing checks and maintenance of equipment, including, but not limited to, augmentative communication devices.(I) Assisting with speech-language pathology research projects, in-service training, and family or community education.The regulations shall provide that speech-language pathology assistants are not authorized to conduct evaluations, interpret data, alter treatment plans, or perform any task without the express knowledge and approval of a supervising speech-language pathologist.(5) The requirements for the wearing of distinguishing name badges with the title of speech-language pathology assistant.(6) Minimum continuing professional development requirements for the speech-language pathology assistant, not to exceed 12 hours in a two-year period. The speech-language pathology assistant’s supervisor shall act as a professional development advisor. The speech-language pathology assistant’s professional growth may be satisfied with successful completion of state or regional conferences, workshops, formal in-service presentations, independent study programs, courses offered by entities listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 2532.6, or any combination of these concerning communication and related disorders. Coursework from a master’s degree that would qualify an applicant for licensure as a speech-language pathologist pursuant to Section 2532.2 shall not be used to satisfy this requirement.(7) Minimum continuing professional development requirements for the supervisor of a speech-language pathology assistant.(8) The type and amount of direct and indirect supervision required for speech-language pathology assistants.(9) The maximum number of assistants permitted per supervisor.(10) A requirement that the supervising speech-language pathologist shall remain responsible and accountable for clinical judgments and decisions and the maintenance of the highest quality and standards of practice when a speech-language pathology assistant is utilized.SEC. 29. Section 2538.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.3. A person applying for approval as a speech-language pathology assistant shall have graduated from a speech-language pathology assistant associate degree program, or equivalent course of study, approved by the board. A person who has successfully graduated from a board-approved bachelor’s degree program in speech-language pathology, communication disorders, speech, language, and hearing sciences, communication sciences and disorders, or communicative disorders shall be deemed to have satisfied an equivalent course of study.SEC. 30. Section 2538.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.5. This article shall not be construed to limit the utilization of a speech aide or other personnel employed by a public school working under the direct supervision of a credentialed speech-language pathologist as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 3051.1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations so long as the speech aide or other personnel is not performing the scope of responsibility, duties, and functions of a speech-language pathology assistant as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 2538.1.SEC. 31. Section 2538.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.7. (a) No person who is not registered as a speech-language pathology assistant shall utilize the title speech-language pathology assistant, SLP assistant, or the letters “SLPA,” or a similar title that includes the words speech or language when combined with the term assistant.(b) No person who is not registered as a speech-language pathology assistant shall perform the duties or functions of a speech-language pathology assistant, except as provided by this article.SEC. 32. Section 2538.8 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2538.8. A speech-language pathology assistant shall not advertise or otherwise represent that they hold a license as a speech-language pathologist.SEC. 33. Section 2538.10 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.10. For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Advertise” and its variants include the use of a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, book, notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, poster, bill, sign, placard, card, label, tag, window display, store sign, radio, or television announcement, or any other means or methods now or hereafter employed to bring to the attention of the public the practice of fitting or selling of hearing aids.(b) “License” means a license to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids to an individual or individuals with impaired hearing.(c) “Licensee” means a person holding a license issued pursuant to this article and includes a permanent, temporary, or trainee license.(d) “Hearing aid” means any wearable instrument or device designed for, or offered for the purpose of, aiding or compensating for impaired human hearing.(e) “Fund” means the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund.SEC. 34. Section 2538.11 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.11. (a) “Practice of fitting or selling hearing aids,” as used in this article, means those practices used for the purpose of selection and adaptation of hearing aids, including direct observation of the ear, testing of hearing in connection with the fitting and selling of hearing aids, taking of ear mold impressions, fitting or sale of hearing aids, and any necessary postfitting counseling.The practice of fitting or selling hearing aids does not include the act of concluding the transaction by a retail clerk.When any audiometer or other equipment is used in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, it shall be kept properly calibrated and in good working condition, and the calibration of the audiometer or other equipment shall be checked at least annually.(b) A licensee shall not conduct diagnostic hearing tests when conducting tests in connection with the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.(c) Hearing tests conducted pursuant to this article shall include those that are in compliance with the Food and Drug Administration Guidelines for Hearing Aid Devices and those that are specifically covered in the licensing examination prepared and administered by the board.SEC. 35. Section 2538.13 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.13. In fitting hearing aids, a licensee shall not take facial measurements or fit, adjust, or adapt lenses or spectacle frames, except that a licensee may replace the temple or temples of a person’s spectacle frames with a temple or temples incorporating hearing aid components.SEC. 36. Section 2538.14 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.14. “Hearing aid dispenser,” as used in this article, means a person who is issued a permanent license pursuant to this article.SEC. 37. Section 2538.18 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.18. All hearing aid dispensers shall continue their education after receiving their license. The board shall provide by regulation, as a condition to the renewal of a license, that the hearing aid dispenser shall submit documentation satisfactory to the board that they have informed themselves of current practices related to the fitting of hearing aids by having pursued courses of study satisfactory to the board or by other means defined as equivalent by the board.Continuing education courses shall be subject to monitoring to ensure compliance with the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section.SEC. 38. Section 2538.23 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.23. (a) Hearing aids may be sold online, by catalog, or direct mail provided that:(1) The seller is licensed as a hearing aid dispenser in this state or is a temporary licensee who does not require supervision.(2) There is no fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to the taking of an ear impression for an earmold by the seller.(3) The seller has received a statement which is signed by a physician and surgeon, audiologist, or a hearing aid dispenser, licensed by the State of California which verifies that Section 2538.36 and subdivision (b) of Section 2538.49 have been complied with.(b) A copy of the statement referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be retained by the seller for the period provided for in Section 2538.38.(c) A hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, who sells a hearing aid under this section shall not be required to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 2538.49.SEC. 39. Section 2538.26 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.26. The board shall issue a license to all applicants who have satisfied this article, who are at least 18 years of age, who possess a high school diploma or its equivalent, who have not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, and who have paid the fees provided for in Section 2538.57. No license shall be issued to any person other than an individual.SEC. 40. Section 2538.28 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.28. (a) An applicant who has fulfilled the requirements of Section 2538.24, and has made application therefor, and who proves to the satisfaction of the board that they will be supervised and trained by a hearing aid dispenser who is approved by the board may have a trainee license issued to them. The trainee license shall entitle the trainee licensee to fit or sell hearing aids as set forth in regulations of the board. The supervising dispenser shall be responsible for any acts or omissions committed by a trainee licensee under their supervision that may constitute a violation of this article.(b) The board shall adopt regulations setting forth criteria for its refusal to approve a hearing aid dispenser to supervise a trainee licensee, including procedures to appeal that decision.(c) A trainee license issued pursuant to this section is effective and valid for six months from date of issue. The board may renew the trainee license for an additional period of six months. Except as provided in subdivision (d), the board shall not issue more than two renewals of a trainee license to any applicant. Notwithstanding subdivision (d), if a trainee licensee who is entitled to renew a trainee license does not renew the trainee license and applies for a new trainee license at a later time, the new trainee license shall only be issued and renewed subject to the limitations set forth in this subdivision.(d) A new trainee license may be issued pursuant to this section if a trainee license issued pursuant to subdivision (c) has lapsed for a minimum of three years from the expiration or cancellation date of the previous trainee license. The board may issue only one new trainee license under this subdivision.SEC. 41. Section 2538.33 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.33. (a) Before engaging in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, each licensee shall notify the board in writing of the address or addresses where they are to engage, or intend to engage, in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, and of any changes in their address or addresses within 30 days of engaging in that practice.(b) If the address or addresses provided pursuant to subdivision (a) is not the address or addresses at which the licensee receives mail, the licensee shall also notify the board in writing of the mailing address for each location where the licensee is to engage, or intends to engage, in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, and of any change in the mailing address or addresses.SEC. 42. Section 2538.34 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.34. (a) Every hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, who engages in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids shall have an established retail business address routinely open for service to customers or clients. The address of that place of business shall be registered with the board as provided in Section 2538.33.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if a hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, engages in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids at more than one place of business within this state, they shall apply for and procure a branch office license for each branch place of business. The application shall state the name of the person and the address of the place or places of business for which the branch office license is desired.(c) (1) A hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, may, without obtaining a branch office license, engage on a temporary basis in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids at another business or at a location or facility that they may use on a temporary basis, provided that the hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, notifies the board in advance in writing of the dates and addresses of those businesses, locations, or facilities at which they will engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “temporary basis” means a limited and short period of time that is not intended to occur repeatedly.SEC. 43. Section 2538.37 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.37. No hearing aid shall be sold by an individual licensed under this article, to a person 16 years of age or younger, unless within the preceding six months a recommendation for a hearing aid has been made by both a board-certified, or a board-eligible physician specializing in otolaryngology, and by a state-licensed audiologist. A replacement of an identical hearing aid within one year shall be an exception to this requirement.SEC. 44. Section 2538.38 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.38. A hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, shall, upon the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid, keep and maintain records in the licensee’s office or place of business at all times and each record shall be kept and maintained for a seven-year period. All records related to the sale and fitting of hearing aids shall be open to inspection by the board or its authorized representatives upon reasonable notice. The records kept shall include:(a) Results of test techniques as they pertain to fitting of the hearing aid.(b) A copy of the written notice and the written receipt required by Section 2538.35 and the written recommendation and receipt required by Section 2538.36 when applicable.(c) Records of maintenance or calibration of equipment used in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.SEC. 45. Section 2538.48 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.48. It is unlawful to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids in this state without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unexpired license.SEC. 46. Section 2538.49 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.49. It is unlawful for a licensee to fit or sell a hearing aid unless they first do all of the following:(a) Comply with all provisions of state laws and regulations relating to the fitting or selling of hearing aids.(b) Conduct a direct observation of the purchaser’s ear canals.(c) Inform the purchaser of the address and office hours at which the licensee shall be available for fitting or postfitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid or aids sold.SEC. 47. Section 2538.50 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.50. It is unlawful to advertise by displaying a sign or otherwise or hold themselves out to be a person engaged in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked license.SEC. 48. Section 2538.51 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.51. It is unlawful to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids without the hearing aid dispenser, or temporary licensee who does not require supervision, having an established business address, routinely open for service to their clients.SEC. 49. Section 2538.53 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.53. (a) A license issued under this article expires at midnight on its assigned renewal date.(b) To renew an unexpired permanent license, the hearing aid dispenser shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.(c) Trainee license holders shall renew their license in accordance with Section 2538.28 and apply for that renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee for a trainee license.(d) Each license issued for a branch office shall expire on the same date as the permanent license of the hearing aid dispenser to whom the branch office license was issued. A branch office license shall be renewed according to subdivision (b).SEC. 50. Section 2538.57 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2538.57. The amount of fees and penalties prescribed by this article shall be those set forth in this section unless a lower fee is fixed by the board:(a) The fee for applicants applying for the first time for a license is seventy-five dollars ($75), which shall not be refunded, except to applicants who are found to be ineligible to take an examination for a license. Those applicants are entitled to a refund of fifty dollars ($50).(b) The fees for taking or retaking the written and practical examinations shall be amounts fixed by the board, which shall be equal to the actual cost of preparing, grading, analyzing, and administering the examinations.(c) The initial temporary or trainee license fee is one hundred dollars ($100). The fee for renewal of a trainee license is one hundred dollars ($100) for each renewal.(d) The initial permanent license fee is two hundred eighty dollars ($280). The fee for renewal of a permanent license is not more than two hundred eighty dollars ($280) for each renewal.(e) The initial branch office license fee is twenty-five dollars ($25). The fee for renewal of a branch office license is twenty-five dollars ($25) for each renewal.(f) The delinquency fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).(g) The fee for issuance of a replacement license is twenty-five dollars ($25).(h) The continuing education course approval application fee is fifty dollars ($50).(i) The fee for official certification of licensure is fifteen dollars ($15).SEC. 51. Section 2539.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2539.1. (a) (1) In addition to satisfying the licensure and examination requirements described in Sections 2532, 2532.2, and 2532.25, no licensed audiologist shall sell hearing aids unless they complete an application for a dispensing audiology license, pay all applicable fees, and pass an examination, approved by the board, relating to selling hearing aids.(2) The board shall issue a dispensing audiology license to a licensed audiologist who meets the requirements of paragraph (1).(b) The board shall not prevent an audiologist who also has a hearing aid dispenser license, issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10), from maintaining dual or separate licenses if they choose to do so.(c) A licensed hearing aid dispenser who meets the qualifications for licensure as an audiologist described in Sections 2532, 2532.2, and 2532.25 shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for the purposes of obtaining a dispensing audiology license.(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the board shall provide the hearing aid dispenser examination provided by the former Hearing Aid Dispensers Bureau until the next examination validation and occupational analysis is completed by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Section 139 and a determination is made that a different examination is to be administered.SEC. 52. Section 2539.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2539.2. (a) Hearing aids may be sold online, by catalog, or direct mail provided that:(1) The seller is licensed as an audiologist in this state and is authorized to sell hearing aids pursuant to Section 2539.1.(2) There is no fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to the taking of an ear impression for an earmold by the seller.(3) The seller has received a statement which is signed by a physician and surgeon, audiologist, or a hearing aid dispenser, licensed by the State of California which verifies that Section 2539.6 has been complied with.(b) A copy of the statement referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be retained by the seller for the period provided for in Section 2539.10.SEC. 53. Section 2539.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2539.6. (a) Whenever any of the following conditions are found to exist either from observations by the licensed dispensing audiologist or on the basis of information furnished by the prospective hearing aid user, a licensed dispensing audiologist shall, prior to fitting or selling a hearing aid to any individual, suggest to that individual in writing that the individual’s best interests would be served if they consult a licensed physician and surgeon specializing in diseases of the ear or, if none are available in the community, a duly licensed physician and surgeon:(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear.(2) History of, or active, drainage from the ear within the previous 90 days.(3) History of sudden or rapidly progressive hearing loss within the previous 90 days.(4) Acute or chronic dizziness.(5) Unilateral hearing loss of sudden or recent onset within the previous 90 days.(6) Significant air-bone gap (when generally acceptable standards have been established).(7) Visible evidence of significant cerumen accumulation or a foreign body in the ear canal.(8) Pain or discomfort in the ear.(b) No referral for medical opinion need be made by any licensed dispensing audiologist in the instance of replacement only of a hearing aid that has been lost or damaged beyond repair within one year of the date of purchase. A copy of the written recommendation shall be retained by the licensed dispensing audiologist for the period provided for in Section 2539.10. A person receiving the written recommendation who elects to purchase a hearing aid shall sign a receipt for the same, and the receipt shall be kept with the other papers retained by the licensed dispensing audiologist for the period provided for in Section 2539.10. Nothing in this section required to be performed by a licensed dispensing audiologist shall mean that the licensed dispensing audiologist is engaged in the diagnosis of illness or the practice of medicine or any other activity prohibited by the provisions of this code.SEC. 54. Section 2539.8 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 55. Section 2539.12 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2539.12. A licensed dispensing audiologist who is the owner, manager, or franchisee at a location where hearing aids are fit or sold, shall be responsible for the adequacy of the fitting or selling of any hearing aid fit and sold by any licensee or licensees at that location.SEC. 56. Section 2539.14 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2539.14. (a) A licensed dispensing audiologist who satisfies the requirements of Section 2539.1 is authorized to sell hearing aids pursuant to the requirements in Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10).(b) The provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2538.11 or Sections 2538.12, 2538.14, 2538.37, 2538.53, 2538.54, 2538.55, and 2538.56 do not apply to a licensed audiologist who satisfies the requirements of Section 2539.1.SEC. 57. Section 2539.15 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2539.15. All dispensing audiologists shall continue their education after receiving their license. The board shall provide by regulation, as a condition to the renewal of a license, that the dispensing audiologist shall submit documentation satisfactory to the board that they have informed themselves of current practices related to audiology and the fitting of hearing aids by having pursued courses of study satisfactory to the board or by other means defined as equivalent by the board.Continuing education courses shall be subject to monitoring to ensure compliance with the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section. SEC. 58. Section 2539.16 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2539.16. (a) A license issued under this article expires at midnight on its assigned renewal date.(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.SEC. 59. Section 2539.17 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2539.17. Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this article. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 2539.16 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed. SEC. 60. Section 2539.18 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2539.18. (a) A license which has been suspended is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article but renewal does not entitle the holder of the license, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the fitting or selling of hearing aids, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.(b) A license that has been revoked is subject to expiration, but it shall not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.SEC. 61. Section 2539.19 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2539.19. A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but the holder of the expired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following apply:(a) They have not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.(b) They pay all of the fees that would be required if they were applying for a license for the first time.(c) They take and pass the examination that would be required if they were applying for a license for the first time or otherwise establish to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, they are qualified to practice as a dispensing audiologist.SEC. 62. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.